local/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.az.dix.xml
      <pardef n="çıx/maq__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>aram</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arammı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maram</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marammı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arsan</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arsanmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsan</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsanmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ar</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>armı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arıq</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arıqmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marıq</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marıqmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arsınız</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arsınızmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsınız</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsınızmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arlar</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arlarmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlar</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlarmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

    <e lm="nəzir etmək"><i>nəzir<b/>et</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ağlamaq"><i>ağla</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anmaq"><i>an</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="asmaq"><i>as</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aşmaq"><i>aş</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="atmaq"><i>at</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="azmaq"><i>az</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="boğmaq"><i>boğ</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buyurmaq"><i>buyur</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="coşmaq"><i>coş</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çaxmaq"><i>çax</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çarpmaq"><i>çarp</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cummaq"><i>cum</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dolmaq"><i>dol</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="donmaq"><i>don</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="doymaq"><i>doy</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duymaq"><i>duy</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aldanmaq"><i>aldan</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qapmaq"><i>qap</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qatmaq"><i>qat</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qılmaq"><i>qıl</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qırxmaq"><i>qırx</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qırpmaq"><i>qırp</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="azaltmaq"><i>azalt</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fəda etmək"><i>fəda<b/>et</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qızmaq"><i>qız</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qurmaq"><i>qur</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saçmaq"><i>saç</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sağmaq"><i>sağ</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buraxmaq"><i>burax</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sapmaq"><i>sap</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sallanmaq"><i>sallan</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="başdan etmək"><i>başdan<b/>et</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hörmət etmək"><i>hörmət<b/>et</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sızmaq"><i>sız</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çaşmaq"><i>çaş</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="daşmaq"><i>daş</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tərəfdar olmaq"><i>tərəfdar<b/>ol</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uçmaq"><i>uç</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ummaq"><i>um</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yağmaq"><i>yağ</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yandırmaq"><i>yandır</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yanmaq"><i>yan</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yaymaq"><i>yay</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yazmaq"><i>yaz</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yığmaq"><i>yığ</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yıxmaq"><i>yıx</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cırmaq"><i>cır</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yonmaq"><i>yon</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yormaq"><i>yor</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yummaq"><i>yum</i><par n="çıx/maq__vblex"/></e>
